Montana, session 2025, HB746.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. County control of noise. (1) A governing body may regulate noise
levels within the county by adoption of an ordinance that substantially complies with the provisions of 7-5-103
through 7-5-107.
(2) The ordinance may contain a description of the area covered by the noise ordinance, provide
exceptions for approved activities, or provide limits on noise levels during certain times of the day. The noise
ordinance may apply countywide or pertain to any portion of the county, including an unincorporated city or
town. The noise ordinance may not extend to any area within the boundaries of an incorporated city or town.
(3) The governing body may establish a fine not to exceed $200 as a penalty for violation of the
ordinance. A violation of the ordinance may not be punishable by imprisonment.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 7, chapter 5, part 21, and the provisions of Title 7, chapter 5, part 21, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 746